Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 192.461 is amended to read:
192.461. (1) The office of the Public Records Advocate is created  as an independent office
within the executive department, separate and distinct from any other state agency .
(2) The Public Records  Advocate shall be appointed by the [ Governor from among a panel of
three qualified individuals nominated by the ] Public Records Advisory  Council under ORS 192.481
[and shall be confirmed by the Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565 ].
(3) The Public Records Advocate shall be a member in good standing of the Oregon State Bar.
(4) The term of office of the Public Records Advocate shall be four years,  except that the ad-
vocate may be removed for cause by the  [ Governor or upon motion of the ] Public Records Advisory
Council [ with the consent of the Governor ]. A determination to remove for cause may be appealed
as a contested case proceeding under ORS chapter 183.
(5) The advocate may be reappointed to consecutive terms.
(6) The Public Records Advocate is in the [ unclassified] exempt service.
(7)(a) The Public Records Advocate shall select, appoint and fix  the compensation of a
Deputy Public Records Advocate. The Deputy Public Records Advocate shall  be a member in
good standing of the Oregon State Bar.
(b) The Public Records Advocate may delegate to the Deputy Public Records Advocate
any authority, power or duty to act possessed by the Public Records  Advocate except the
power to delegate set forth in this paragraph.
(c) If the position of the Public Records Advocate becomes vacant, the Deputy  Public
Records Advocate shall serve as the acting Public Records Advocate until a new Public Re-
cords Advocate has been appointed.
(8)(a) The Public Records Advocate may hire  and fix the compensation of  [one or more  deputy
advocates or ] other professional staff to assist in performing the duties assigned to the Public Re-
cords Advocate.
(b) Officers and employees of the office of the  Public Records Advocate are in the exempt
service.
Enrolled Senate Bill 500 (SB 500-A) Page 1
(9) The Public Records Advocate may seek out  office facilities and administrative support
from other  state agencies or local public bodies. State agencies shall assist the advocate.
Local public bodies may assist the advocate.
[(8)(a) The State Archivist may furnish office facilities and provide administrative  support to the
Public Records Advocate. ]
[(b) If the State Archivist declines to furnish office facilities and  provide administrative support to
the Public Records Advocate, the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services shall furnish office
facilities and provide administrative support to the advocate. ]
SECTION 2.  ORS 192.481 is amended to read:
192.481. (1) The Public Records Advisory Council is created.
(2) The Public Records Advisory Council consists of:
(a) The Secretary of State or a designee of the Secretary of State;
(b) The Attorney General or a designee of the Attorney General;
(c) The  Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services or a designee of the di-
rector;
(d) A representative of  the news media who is a member in good standing of a professional
journalism association and who is appointed by the Governor;
(e) Two additional representatives of the news media who are appointed by the Governor;
(f) A representative of the cities of this state who is appointed by the Governor;
(g) A representative of the counties of this state who is appointed by the Governor;
(h) A representative of the special districts of this state who is appointed by the Governor;
(i) A representative of the public sector workforce who is appointed by the Governor;
(j) A member of the public who is appointed by the Governor;
(k) A Senator who is appointed by the President of  the Senate and who serves as an ex officio
nonvoting member;
(L) A Representative who is appointed  by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and who
serves as an ex officio nonvoting member; and
(m) [Except as provided in subsection (3) of  this section, ] The Public Records Advocate[ , who shall
serve as chair of the council ].
(3) The council shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson,  who each shall serve in
that capacity for a two-year term, or until  their membership on the council ends, whichever
is of shorter duration. A chairperson or vice chairperson may be reelected to  their positions.
[(3)] (4) At any time when the office of Public Records Advocate is vacant:
[(a) The Secretary of State or a designee of the Secretary of State shall serve as the acting  chair
of the Public Records Advisory Council; ]
[(b)] (a)  The council shall convene at  the time and place designated by the [ acting chair ]
chairperson but within 30 days of the vacancy of the office of Public Records Advocate;
[(c)] (b)  The council shall take up [ only] the question of the [ nomination of three qualified  indi-
viduals for the Governor to consider for appointment under  ORS 192.461 as ] process, selection and
appointment of a new  Public Records Advocate; and
[(d)] (c)  The individual who  had vacated the office of Public Records Advocate may participate
in deliberations and vote on the slate of nominees unless the individual vacated the office for  rea-
sons described in ORS 192.461 (4).
[(4)] (5)  The appointment  of a member of the council described in subsection (2)(d) to (j) of this
section is subject to confirmation by the Senate  in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and
171.565.
[(5)] (6)  A member of the council described  in subsection (2)(d), (e) or (j) of this section is enti-
tled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
[(6)] (7)  The members of the council  described in subsection (2)(d) to (L) of this section shall
each serve two-year terms and may be reappointed to successive terms.
[(7)] (8)  A majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a quorum  for the trans-
action of business.
Enrolled Senate Bill 500 (SB 500-A) Page 2
[(8)] (9)  The council  shall meet at least once every six months. The council also may meet at
other times and places specified by the call of the [ chair] chairperson or of  a majority of the
members of the council.
[(9)] (10) All public bodies, as defined  in ORS 192.311, shall assist the council in the performance
of its duties and, to the extent permitted  by laws relating to confidentiality, furnish such informa-
tion, including public records, and advice as the members of  the council consider necessary to per-
form their duties.
(11)(a) The council may support or oppose legislation relating to public records law.
(b) The council may request that one or more legislators  introduce legislation relating
to public records law.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 192.483 is amended to read:
192.483. (1) The Public Records Advisory Council created under ORS 192.481 shall  periodically
perform all of the following:
(a) Survey state agency and other public body practices and procedures for:
(A) Receiving public  records requests, identifying the existence of records responsive to the re-
quests and gathering and disclosing responsive records;
(B) Determining fee estimates and imposing or waiving fees under ORS 192.324; and
(C) Determining and applying exemptions from required disclosure of public records.
(b) Examine practices similar to those described in paragraph (a) of this subsection in other ju-
risdictions.
(c) Identify inefficiencies and inconsistencies in application of the public  records law that im-
pede transparency in public process and government.
(d) Make recommendations on changes in law,  policy or practice that could enhance transpar-
ency in public process and government, and facilitate rapid dissemination of public  records to re-
questers.
(e) Make recommendations on the role of  the Public Records Advocate as facilitator in disputes
between custodians of public records and public record requesters.
(2) No later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the council shall submit to the Gov-
ernor, and to the Legislative  Assembly in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, a report that de-
scribes the findings of  the council since the council’s last report. The report may include
recommendations for legislation.
(3) The council  or the Public Records Advocate may prepare reports and studies more frequently
than required under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The council may adopt rules governing the operations of the office of the  Public Records
Advocate, including but not limited to rules establishing procedures for  the conduct of facilitated
dispute resolution under ORS 192.464. The council shall consider efficiencies  and the preference for
a policy of transparency and openness in government in  this state in adopting rules under this
subsection.
(5) The Public Records Advocate shall serve as the custodian of all council records.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Public Records  Advocate Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Public Records Advo-
cate Fund shall be credited to the Public Records Advocate Fund.
(2) The Public Records Advocate Fund shall consist of  moneys appropriated or otherwise
transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly and interest earnings of the fund.
(3) Moneys in the Public Records Advocate Fund  are continuously appropriated to the
Public Records Advocate for the purpose of funding the operations of the office of the Public
Records Advocate and the Public Records Advisory Council.
SECTION 5.
Any actions taken by  the Public Records Advisory Council before the effec-
tive date of this 2021 Act to recruit and  appoint a Public Records Advocate are hereby rati-
fied and affirmed.
SECTION 6.  Section 3, chapter 107, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding [ section 8 (6), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS 192.481 (7) :
Enrolled Senate Bill 500 (SB 500-A) Page 3
(1) The  following members of the Public Records Advisory Council shall serve a three-year term
that commenced on January 1, 2018:
(a) The member appointed  under [ section 8 (2)(d), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS 192.481
(2)(d).
(b) One of the members appointed under  [ section 8 (2)(e), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS
192.481 (2)(e).
(c) The member appointed under [ section 8 (2)(g), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS 192.481
(2)(g).
(d) The member appointed  under [ section 8 (2)(i), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS 192.481
(2)(i).
(e) The member  appointed under [ section 8 (2)(L), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS 192.481
(2)(L).
(2) The  following members of the council shall serve a four-year term that commenced on Jan-
uary 1, 2018:
(a) One of the members appointed under [ section 8 (2)(e),  chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS
192.481 (2)(e).
(b) The member appointed  under [ section 8 (2)(f), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS 192.481
(2)(f).
(c) The member appointed under  [ section 8 (2)(h), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS 192.481
(2)(h).
(d) The member appointed  under [ section 8 (2)(j), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS 192.481
(2)(j).
(e) The member appointed under [ section 8 (2)(k), chapter 728, Oregon Laws 2017 ] ORS 192.481
(2)(k).
SECTION 7. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 500 (SB 500-A) Page 4